Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 5. Pregnancy, Childbirth, and Family Leave for Public Employees.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and purpose related to the enactment of this article, see § 2, ch. 96, SLA 1992 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 39.20.500.
Employment benefits and privileges for health and family care.

An employer shall grant an employee whose health is affected by pregnancy, childbirth, or a related medical condition the same employment benefits and privileges that the employer grants to other employees with similar ability to work who are not so affected, including allowing the employee to take disability or sick leave or other accrued leave that the employer makes available to temporarily disabled employees.

An employee is eligible to take family leave if the employee has been employed by the employer for at least 35 hours a week for at least six consecutive months or for at least 17 1/2 hours a week for at least 12 consecutive months immediately preceding the leave. The leave may be unpaid leave. However, the employee may choose to substitute, or the employer may require the employee to substitute, accrued paid leave to which the employee is entitled. An employer shall permit an eligible employee to take family leave because of a serious health condition for a total of 18 workweeks during any 24-month period. An employer shall permit an eligible employee to take family leave because of pregnancy and childbirth or adoption for a total of 18 workweeks within a 12-month period; the right to take leave for this reason expires on the date one year after the birth or placement of the child. If the employee is entitled to a longer period of time under (a) of this section, then the longer period applies. An eligible employee is entitled to take family leave

because of pregnancy and the birth of a child of the employee or the placement of a child, other than the employee’s stepchild, with the employee for adoption; an employer may require that an employee using family leave under this paragraph take the leave in a single block of time;

in order to care for the employee’s child, spouse, or parent who has a serious health condition; in this paragraph, “child” includes the employee’s biological, adopted, or foster child, stepchild, or legal ward; and

because of the employee’s own serious health condition.

Notwithstanding (b) of this section, if a parent or child of two employees employed by the same employer has a serious health condition, the employer is not required to grant family leave to both employees simultaneously.

During the time that an employee is on leave under this section, the employer shall maintain coverage under any group health plan at the level and under the conditions that coverage would have been provided if the employee had been employed continuously from the date the leave began to the date the employee returns from leave under (e) of this section. However, the employer may require that the employee pay all or part of the costs for maintaining health insurance coverage during a period of unpaid leave.

Unless the employer’s business circumstances have changed to make it impossible or unreasonable, when an employee returns from leave under this section, the employer shall restore the employee

to the position of employment held by the employee when the leave began; or

to a substantially similar position with substantially similar benefits, pay, and other terms and conditions of employment.

This section does not apply to an employer’s small employment facility if the total number of employees employed within 50 road miles of the small employment facility, including those employed at the facility, was fewer than 21 during the 20 consecutive workweeks in which the employer employed at least 21 employees at all business facilities.

History.

(§ 6 ch 96 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

23.10.500

. Renumbered in 2002.

Collateral references. —

Adequacy of notice to employer of need for leave under Federal Family and Medical Leave Act 1993, 184 ALR Fed. 171.

Sec. 39.20.510.
Employee notice.

If the necessity for leave under AS

39.20.500

is foreseeable based on an expected birth or adoption or on planned medical treatment or supervision, the employee shall provide the employer with prior notice of the expected need for leave in a manner that is reasonable and practicable. If the necessity for leave under that section is foreseeable based on planned medical treatment or supervision, the employee shall also make a reasonable effort to schedule the treatment or supervision so as not to disrupt unduly the operations of the employer, subject to the approval of the health care provider of the employee or the employee’s child, spouse, or parent.

History.

(§ 6 ch 96 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 23.10.510. Renumbered in 2002, at which time “AS

39.20.500

” was substituted for “AS

23.10.500

” to reflect the 2002 renumbering of AS

23.10.500

.

Sec. 39.20.520.
Employee transfer.

A pregnant employee may request a transfer to a suitable position under this section. An employer may not fill the position with a person other than the requesting employee until the employer has offered the position to the employee and the employee has refused the offer. A position is suitable if

it is an existing unfilled position in the same administrative division in which the employee is currently employed and is less strenuous or less hazardous than the employee’s current position;

transfer to the position is recommended by a licensed health care provider;

the employee is qualified and immediately able to perform the duties of the position; and

the transfer will not subject the employer to legal liability under a collective bargaining contract or employment contract.

An employer shall compensate an employee who receives a transfer under this section at a rate at least equal to the lesser of the rate, as adjusted by changes to compensation that apply generally to the work force, at which

the employee was compensated immediately before requesting the transfer; or

the position into which the employee transfers is compensated.

History.

(§ 6 ch 96 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 23.10.520. Renumbered in 2002.

Administrative Code. —

For appointments, see 2 AAC 7, art. 5.

Sec. 39.20.530.
Application to other laws.

The provisions of AS

39.20.500

—

39.20.550

do not affect any other provision of law relating to sex discrimination, pregnancy, or parenthood.

The provisions of AS

39.20.500

—

39.20.550

are subject to collective bargaining. However, except as provided in (c) of this section, a collective bargaining contract that does not contain benefit provisions at least as beneficial to the employee as those provided by AS

39.20.500

—

39.20.550

shall be considered to contain the benefit provisions of those statutes.

The commissioner of education and early development may approve a collective bargaining agreement entered into between a school district or a regional educational attendance area and a bargaining organization representing certificated employees that does not meet the leave requirements of AS

39.20.500

—

39.20.550

, if the district or attendance area establishes to the satisfaction of the commissioner that a variance from the requirements of AS

39.20.500

—

39.20.550

is necessary to avoid a hardship on the school district based on the lack of qualified, available substitute teachers to replace teachers on leave under AS 39.20.500 — 39.20.550 or the lack of available housing for replacement teachers who do not live in the community.

History.

(§ 6 ch 96 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 23.10.530. Renumbered in 2002, at which time “AS

39.20.500

—

39.20.550

” was substituted for “AS

23.10.500

— 23.10.550” throughout this section to reflect the 2002 renumbering of AS

23.10.500

— 23.10.550.

In 1999, “commissioner of education” was changed to “commissioner of education and early development” in (c) of this section in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 39.20.540.
Investigation and conciliation of complaints.

A person aggrieved by a denial of a right or privilege granted by AS

39.20.500

—

39.20.540

may file a complaint with the Department of Labor and Workforce Development.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall informally, promptly, and impartially investigate the matters set out in a filed complaint. If the investigator determines that the allegations are supported by substantial evidence, the investigator shall immediately try to eliminate the denial of rights or privileges by conference, conciliation, and persuasion.

History.

(§ 6 ch 96 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 23.10.540. Renumbered in 2002, at which time “AS

39.20.500

—

39.20.540

” was substituted for “AS

23.10.500

— 23.10.540” to reflect the 2002 renumbering of AS

23.10.500

— 23.10.540, and “of labor and workforce development” was inserted after both occurrences of “department” in order to retain the applicability of the definition of “department” in AS

23.90.900

.

Sec. 39.20.550.
Definitions.

In AS

39.20.500

—

39.20.550

,

“child” means an individual who is

under 18 years of age; or

18 years of age or older and incapable of self-care because of mental or physical disability;

“employer” means the state and a political subdivision of the state that employed at least 21 employees in the state for each working day during any period of 20 consecutive workweeks in the preceding two calendar years; “employer” does not include a regional Native housing authority created under AS

18.55.995

—

18.55.998

;

“health care provider” means a dentist licensed under AS 08.36, a physician licensed under AS 08.64, or a psychologist licensed under AS 08.86;

“parent” means a biological or adoptive parent, a parent-in-law, or a stepparent;

“serious health condition” means an illness, injury, impairment, or physical or mental condition that involves

inpatient care in a hospital, hospice, or residential health care facility; or

continuing treatment or continuing supervision by a health care provider;

“small employment facility” means a facility of an employer that did not employ 21 or more employees during any period of 20 consecutive workweeks in the preceding two calendar years;

“state” includes the University of Alaska, the Alaska Railroad, and the executive, legislative, and judicial branches of state government including public and quasi-public corporations and authorities established by law.

History.

(§ 6 ch 96 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 23.10.550. Renumbered in 2002, at which time “AS

39.20.500

—

39.20.550

” was substituted for “AS

23.10.500

— 23.10.550” to reflect the 2002 renumbering of AS

23.10.500

— 23.10.550.